Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6524
Defense Efforts Workforce Act, how cited.

Sections 77-6524 to 77-6543 shall be known and may be cited as the Defense Efforts Workforce Act.

Laws 2025, LB649, § 1.
July 1, 2027